Utah, session 2026, HB192.
Section 1. Section 53-8-206 is amended to read:53-8-206. Safety inspection -- Station requirements -- Permits not transferable -- Certificate of inspection -- Fees -- Unused certificates -- Suspension or revocation of permits.(1)The safety inspection required under this part may only be performed:(a)by a person certified by the division as a safety inspector; and(b)at a safety inspection station with a valid safety inspection station permit issued by the division.(2)(a)A safety inspection station permit may not be assigned, or transferred, or used at anya location other than a designated location.(b)The holder of a safety inspection station permit shall post the permit in a conspicuous place at the location designated in the permit.(3)If required by the division, the safety inspector shall keep a record and file a report of every safety inspection and every safety inspection certificate issued.(4)(a)A safety inspection station holding a safety inspection station permit issued by the division may charge a reasonable fee for labor in performing safety inspections, not to exceed:.(a)$14 or less for motorcycles and street-legal all-terrain vehicles;(b)unless Subsection (4)(a) or (c) applies, $30 or less for motor vehicles; or(c)$40 or less for 4-wheel drive, split axle, and any motor vehicles that necessitate disassembly of front hub or removal of rear axle for inspection.(b)A safety inspection station charging a fee as described in Subsection (4)(a) shall conspicuously post the fee amount before performing a safety inspection.(5)(a)A safety inspection station may return to the division unused safety inspection certificates in a quantity of 10 or more.(b)The division shall reimburse the station for the cost of the returned safety inspection certificates.(6)(a)Upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation of a safety inspection station permit and after the conclusion of anyan adjudicative proceedingsproceeding upholding the suspension or revocation, the safety inspection station permit holder shall:(i)immediately terminate all safety inspection activities; and(ii)return all safety inspection certificates and the safety inspection station permit to the division.(b)The division shall issue a receipt for all unused safety inspection certificates.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.